Maine, session 132, LD994.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 23 MRSA §3121, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 13, §1, is amended to
read:
1. Cost sharing. If more than one property shares a common benefit from a private
road, each property owner who shares the common benefit is responsible for a share of the
cost of reasonable and necessary repairs to and maintenance of that private road determined
pursuant to the terms of any agreement entered into to determine the share of the cost of
reasonable and necessary repairs to and maintenance of the private road, any deed
restriction, covenant or declaration applicable to the benefited property, any road
association created pursuant to this chapter or otherwise or any method elected under
section 3101, when applicable. In the absence of any such agreement, entered into to
determine the share of the cost of reasonable and necessary repairs to and maintenance of
the private road; deed restriction, covenant, or declaration, applicable to the benefited
property; road association established for the private road; or method elected under section
3101 to determine the share of the cost of reasonable and necessary repairs to and
maintenance of the private road, each residential property owner, after reasonable due
process and written notice, shall share equally in the cost of reasonable and necessary
repairs to and maintenance of the private road when the private road is the primary means
of access to the benefited property. For purposes of this section, each residential property
may be assessed only one share toward the collective cost of repairs and maintenance
regardless of whether there are multiple owners of record for one property.
Sec. 2. 23 MRSA §3121, sub-§3, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 13, §1, is amended to
read:
3. Enforcement. If a residential property owner fails to pay that owner's share of the
cost of reasonable and necessary repairs to and maintenance of the private road in
accordance with subsection 1, the payment is delinquent if not paid within 30 days after a
demand in writing, a legal claim which must contain the name of the vendor, the purpose
of the repair or maintenance and the date the vendor was paid and must be delivered to that
owner at the address set forth in the municipal tax records, and a civil action for payment
of the amount owed together with interest from the date of the written demand for payment,
filing fees and other costs of collection including reasonable attorney's fees may be brought
against that owner by a residential property owner or owners who share a common benefit
in the road, either jointly or severally.